Arkansas, session 2025, HB1288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-411(a)(6), concerning the payment
responsibility of a healthcare insurer to a participating provider, is
amended to read as follows:
(6)(A)(i) For Except as provided in subdivision (a)(6)(B) of
this section, for payment purposes, a healthcare insurer shall treat an
applicant physician as a participating physician from the date of submission
of a substantially completed application once an applicant physician has been
approved through an insurer's credentialing process.
(ii) As used in subdivision (a)(6)(A)(i) of this
section, "date of submission of a substantially completed application" means
the date a healthcare insurer receives an applicant physician's
credentialling information, as defined under § 17-95-107, from the
Centralized Credentials Verification Service of the Arkansas State Medical
*ANS017*
03-19-2025 14:23:40 ANS017

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/13/25 H2/20/25 H2/27/25 S3/19/25 HB1288
Board.
(B) Subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section does not apply
to the Arkansas Medicaid Program.
/s/L. Johnson
































03-19-2025 14:23:40 ANS017